New York, session 2025-2026, A9635.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph c of subdivision 3 of section 74 of the public 2 officers law, as amended by section 7 of part K of chapter 286 of the 3 laws of 2016, is amended to read as follows: 4 c. No officer or employee of a state agency, member of the legislature 5 or legislative employee should disclose confidential information 6 acquired by [him or her] such person in the course of [his or her] their 7 official duties nor use such information acquired by such person in the 8 course of their official duties to further [his or her] their personal 9 interests, including using that information to participate in prediction 10 markets and/or mobile sports wagering platforms that include, but are 11 not limited to: 12 (i) Polymarket; 13 (ii) Kalshi; 14 (iii) PredictIt; 15 (iv) Iowa Electronic Market; 16 (v) Auger; 17 (vi) Robinhood; 18 (vii) FanDuel; 19 (viii) DraftKings. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 21 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14464-01-6